District of Columbia statutes.
31-5315

Benefits not attachable.

No money or other benefit, charity, relief, or aid to be paid, provided, or rendered by any society, shall be liable to attachment, garnishment, or other process, or to be seized, taken, appropriated, or applied by any legal or equitable process or operation of law to pay any debt or liability of a member or beneficiary, or any other person who may have a right thereunder, either before or after payment by the society.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1216, 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1245.